Illinois, session 104th, SB3889.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-117-13.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-117-13.5 new)7    Sec. 11-117-13.5. Referendum to approve sale of municipal 8water or sewer system. Except as provided in Section 911-117-14, before the sale of a water system or sewer system 10owned by a municipality to a private entity, a referendum 11shall be submitted to the electors of the municipality. A 12majority vote authorizing the sale of the water system or 13sewer system shall be required from the electors of the 14municipality before the sale or purchase can occur. This 15Section applies to a water system or sewer system owned by a 16municipality that provides service to more than 1,000 customer 17connections. 18    Section 10. The Public Utilities Act is amended by 19changing Section 9-210.5 as follows: 20    (220 ILCS 5/9-210.5)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on June 1, 2028)  SB3889- 2 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1    Sec. 9-210.5. Valuation of water and sewer utilities. 2    (a) In this Section:3        "Disinterested" means that the person directly 4    involved (1) is not a director, officer, or an employee of 5    the large public utility or the water or sewer utility or 6    its direct affiliates or subsidiaries for at least 12 7    months before becoming engaged under this Section; (2) 8    shall not derive a material financial benefit from the 9    sale of the water or sewer utility other than fees for 10    services rendered, and (3) shall not have a member of the 11    person's immediate family, including a spouse, parents or 12    spouse's parents, children or spouses of children, or 13    siblings and their spouses or children, be a director, 14    officer, or employee of either the large public utility or 15    water or sewer utility or the water or sewer utility or its 16    direct affiliates or subsidiaries for at least 12 months 17    before becoming engaged under this Section or receive a 18    material financial benefit from the sale of the water or 19    sewer utility other than fees for services rendered.20        "District" means a service area of a large public 21    utility whose customers are subject to the same rate 22    tariff.23        "Large public utility" means an investor-owned public 24    utility that:25            (1) is subject to regulation by the Illinois 26        Commerce Commission under this Act;  SB3889- 3 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1            (2) regularly provides water or sewer service to 2        more than 15,000 customer connections;3            (3) provides safe and adequate service; and4            (4) is not a water or sewer utility as defined in 5        this subsection (a).6        "Next rate case" means a large public utility's first 7    general rate case after the date the large public utility 8    acquires the water or sewer utility where the acquired 9    water or sewer utility's cost of service is considered as 10    part of determining the large public utility's resulting 11    rates.12        "Prior rate case" means a large public utility's 13    general rate case resulting in the rates in effect for the 14    large public utility at the time it acquires the water or 15    sewer utility.16        "Utility service source" means the water or sewer 17    utility or large public utility from which the customer 18    receives its utility service type.19        "Utility service type" means water utility service or 20    sewer utility service or water and sewer utility service.21        "Water or sewer utility" means any of the following:22            (1) a public utility that regularly provides water 23        or sewer service to 6,000 or fewer customer 24        connections;25            (2) a water district, including, but not limited 26        to, a public water district, water service district,   SB3889- 4 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1        or surface water protection district, or a sewer 2        district of any kind established as a special district 3        under the laws of this State that regularly provides 4        water or sewer service to 6,000 or fewer customer 5        connections;6            (3) a waterworks system or sewerage system 7        established under the Township Code that regularly 8        provides water or sewer service to 6,000 or fewer 9        customer connections; or10            (4) a water system or sewer system owned by a 11        municipality that regularly provides water or sewer 12        service to 6,000 or fewer customer connections; or and13            (5) any other entity that is not a public utility 14        that regularly provides water or sewer service to 15        6,000 or fewer customer connections.16    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 17large public utility that acquires a water or sewer utility 18may request that the Commission use, and, if so requested, the 19Commission shall use, the procedures set forth under this 20Section to establish the ratemaking rate base of that water or 21sewer utility at the time when it is acquired by the large 22public utility.23    (c) If a large public utility elects the procedures under 24this Section to establish the rate base of a water or sewer 25utility that it is acquiring, then 3 appraisals shall be 26performed. The average of these 3 appraisals shall represent   SB3889- 5 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1the fair market value of the water or sewer utility that is 2being acquired. The appraisals shall be performed by 3 3appraisers approved by the Commission's Executive Director or 4designee and engaged by either the water or sewer utility 5being acquired or by the large public utility. Each appraiser 6shall be engaged on reasonable terms approved by the 7Commission. Each appraiser shall be a disinterested person 8licensed as a State certified general real estate appraiser 9under the Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 2002.10    Each appraiser shall:11        (1) be sworn to determine the fair market value of the 12    water or sewer utility by establishing the amount for 13    which the water or sewer utility would be sold in a 14    voluntary transaction between a willing buyer and willing 15    seller under no obligation to buy or sell;16        (2) determine fair market value in compliance with the 17    Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;18        (3) engage one disinterested engineer who is licensed 19    in this State, and who may be the same engineer that is 20    engaged by the other appraisers, to prepare an assessment 21    of the tangible assets of the water or sewer utility, 22    which is to be incorporated into the appraisal under the 23    cost approach;24        (4) request from the manager of the Accounting 25    Department, if the water or sewer utility is a public 26    utility that is regulated by the Commission, a list of   SB3889- 6 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1    investments made by the water or sewer utility that had 2    been disallowed previously and that shall be excluded from 3    the calculation of the large public utility's rate base in 4    its next rate case; and 5        (5) return their appraisal, in writing, to the water 6    or sewer utility and large public utility in a reasonable 7    and timely manner.8    If the appraiser cannot engage an engineer, as described 9in paragraph (3) of this subsection (c), within 30 days after 10the appraiser is engaged, then the Commission's Executive 11Director or designee shall recommend the engineer the 12appraiser should engage. The Commission's Executive Director 13or designee shall provide his or her recommendation within 30 14days after he or she is officially notified of the appraiser's 15failure to engage an engineer and the appraiser shall promptly 16work to engage the recommended engineer. If the appraiser is 17unable to negotiate reasonable engagement terms with the 18recommended engineer within 15 days after the recommendation 19by the Commission's Executive Director or designee, then the 20appraiser shall notify the Commission's Executive Director or 21designee and the process shall be repeated until an engineer 22is successfully engaged.23    (d) The lesser of (i) the purchase price or (ii) the fair 24market value determined under subsection (c) of this Section 25shall constitute the rate base associated with the water or 26sewer utility as acquired by and incorporated into the rate   SB3889- 7 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1base of the district designated by the acquiring large public 2utility under this Section, subject to any adjustments that 3the Commission deems necessary to ensure such rate base 4reflects prudent and useful investments in the provision of 5public utility service. The reasonable transaction and closing 6costs incurred by the large public utility shall be treated 7consistent with the applicable accounting standards under this 8Act. The total amount of all of the appraisers' fees to be 9included in the transaction and closing costs shall not exceed 10the greater of $15,000 or 5% of the appraised value of the 11water or sewer utility being acquired. This rate base 12treatment shall not be deemed to violate this Act, including, 13but not limited to, any Sections in Articles VIII and IX of 14this Act that might be affected by this Section. Any 15acquisition of a water or sewer utility that affects the 16cumulative base rates of the large public utility's existing 17ratepayers in the tariff group into which the water or sewer 18utility is to be combined by less than (1) 2.5% at the time of 19the acquisition for any single acquisition completed under 20this Section or (2) 5% for all acquisitions completed under 21this Section before the Commission's final order in the next 22rate case shall not be deemed to violate Section 7-204 or any 23other provision of this Act.24    In the Commission's order that approves the large public 25utility's acquisition of the water or sewer utility, the 26Commission shall issue its decision establishing (1) the   SB3889- 8 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1ratemaking rate base of the water or sewer utility; (2) the 2district or tariff group with which the water or sewer utility 3shall be combined for ratemaking purposes, if such combination 4has been proposed by the large public utility; and (3) the 5rates to be charged to customers in the water or sewer utility.6    (e) If the water or sewer utility being acquired is owned 7by the State or any political subdivision thereof, then the 8water or sewer utility must inform the public of the terms of 9its acquisition by the large public utility by (1) holding a 10public meeting prior to the acquisition and (2) causing to be 11published, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area 12that the water or sewer utility operates, a notice setting 13forth the terms of its acquisition by the large public utility 14and options that shall be available to assist customers to pay 15their bills after the acquisition. 16    (f) The large public utility may recommend the district or 17tariff group of which the water or sewer utility shall, for 18ratemaking purposes, become a part after the acquisition, or 19may recommend a lesser rate for the water or sewer utility. If 20the large public utility recommends a lesser rate, it shall 21submit to the Commission its proposed rate schedule and the 22proposed final tariff group for the acquired water or sewer 23utility. The Commission's approved district or tariff group or 24rates shall be consistent with the large public utility's 25recommendation, unless such recommendation can be shown to be 26contrary to the public interest.  SB3889- 9 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1    (g) From the date of acquisition until the date that new 2rates are effective in the acquiring large public utility's 3next rate case, the customers of the acquired water or sewer 4utility shall pay the approved then-existing rates of the 5district or tariff group as ordered by the Commission, or some 6lesser rates as recommended by the large public utility and 7approved by the Commission under subsection (f); provided, 8that, if the application of such rates of the large public 9utility to customers of the acquired water or sewer utility 10using 54,000 gallons annually results in an increase to the 11total annual bill of customers of the acquired water or sewer 12utility, exclusive of fire service or related charges, then 13the large public utility's rates charged to the customers of 14the acquired water or sewer utility shall be uniformly 15reduced, if any reduction is required, by the percent that 16results in the total annual bill, exclusive of fire services 17or related charges, for the customers of the acquired water or 18sewer utility using 54,000 gallons being equal to 1.5% of the 19latest median household income as reported by the United 20States Census Bureau for the most applicable community or 21county. For each customer of the water or sewer utility with 22potable water usage values that cannot be reasonably obtained, 23a value of 4,500 gallons per month shall be assigned. These 24rates shall not be deemed to violate this Act including, but 25not limited to, Section 9-101 and any other applicable 26Sections in Articles VIII and IX of this Act. The Commission   SB3889- 10 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1shall issue its decision establishing the rates effective for 2the water or sewer utility immediately following an 3acquisition in its order approving the acquisition.4    (h) In the acquiring large public utility's next rate 5case, the water or sewer utility and the district or tariff 6group ordered by the Commission and their costs of service may 7be combined under the same rate tariff. This rate tariff shall 8be based on allocation of costs of service of the acquired 9water or sewer utility and the large public utility's district 10or tariff group ordered by the Commission and utilizing a rate 11design that does not distinguish among customers on the basis 12of utility service source or type. This rate tariff shall not 13be deemed to violate this Act including, but not limited to, 14Section 9-101 of this Act. In the acquiring large public 15utility's 2 rate cases after an acquisition, but in no 16subsequent rate case, the large public utility may file a rate 17tariff for a water or sewer utility acquired under this 18Section that establishes lesser rates than the district or 19tariff group into which the water or sewer utility is to be 20combined. Those lesser rates shall not be deemed to violate 21Section 7-204 or any other provision of this Act if they affect 22the cumulative base rates of the large public utility's 23existing rate payers in the district or tariff by less than 242.5%. 25    (i) Any post-acquisition improvements made by the large 26public utility in the water or sewer utility shall accrue a   SB3889- 11 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1cost for financing set at the large public utility's 2determined rate for allowance for funds used during 3construction, inclusive of the debt, equity, and income tax 4gross up components, after the date on which the expenditure 5was incurred by the large public utility until the investment 6has been in service for a 4-year period or, if sooner, until 7the time the rates are implemented in the large public 8utility's next rate case.9    Any post-acquisition improvements made by the large public 10utility in the water or sewer utility shall not be depreciated 11for ratemaking purposes from the date on which the expenditure 12was incurred by the large public utility until the investment 13has been in service for a 4-year period or, if sooner, until 14the time the rates are implemented in the large public 15utility's next rate case.16    (j) This Section shall be exclusively applied to large 17public utilities in the voluntary and mutually agreeable 18acquisition of water or sewer utilities. Any petitions filed 19with the Commission related to the acquisitions described in 20this Section, including petitions seeking approvals or 21certificates required by this Act, shall be deemed approved 22unless the Commission issues its final order within 11 months 23after the date the large public utility filed its initial 24petition. This Section shall only apply to utilities providing 25water or sewer service and shall not be construed in any manner 26to apply to electric corporations, natural gas corporations,   SB3889- 12 -LRB104 19411 AAS 32859 b1or any other utility subject to this Act.2    (k) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a party from 3declining to proceed with an acquisition or be deemed as 4establishing the final purchase price of an acquisition.5    (l) In the Commission's order that approves the large 6utility's acquisition of the water or sewer utility, the 7Commission shall address each aspect of the acquisition 8transaction for which approval is required under the Act. 9    (m) Any contractor or subcontractor that performs work on 10a water or sewer utility acquired by a large public utility 11under this Section shall be a responsible bidder as described 12in Section 30-22 of the Illinois Procurement Code. The 13contractor or subcontractor shall submit evidence of meeting 14the requirements to be a responsible bidder as described in 15Section 30-22 to the water or sewer utility. Any new water or 16sewer facility built as a result of the acquisition shall 17require the contractor to enter into a project labor 18agreement. The large public utility acquiring the water or 19sewer utility shall offer employee positions to qualified 20employees of the acquired water or sewer utility. 21    (n) This Section is repealed on June 1, 2026 June 1, 2028. 22(Source: P.A. 102-149, eff. 1-1-22.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.